Florida, session 2026, HB1109.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (n) of subsection (2) of section
252.35, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
252.35 Emergency management powers; Division of Emergency
Management.—
(2) The division is responsible for carrying out the
provisions of ss. 252.31-252.90. In performing its duties, the
division shall:
(n) Implement training programs to maintain this state's
status as a national leader in emergency management and improve
the ability of state and local emergency management personnel to
prepare and implement emergency management plans and programs.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1109-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1109 2026
This must include a continuous training program for agencies and
individuals who will be called on to perform key roles in state
and local postdisaster response and recovery efforts and for
local government personnel on federal and state postdisaster
response and recovery strategies and procedures. The division
shall specify requirements for the minimum number of training
hours that county or municipal administrators, county or city
managers, county or municipal emergency management directors,
and county or municipal public works directors or other
officials responsible for the construction and maintenance of
public infrastructure must complete biennially in addition to
the training required pursuant to s. 252.38(1)(b). Such training
may be provided by the division or, for county personnel, by a
foundation that is a not-for-profit corporation under s.
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and has a governing board
that includes in its membership county commissioners and
professional county staff. If training is provided by a
foundation, including the training program required under s.
468.634(2), such training must be approved by the division.
Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
252.381, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
252.381 Information related to natural emergencies;
poststorm county and municipal permitting; operations.—
(2)(a) Each county and municipality shall develop a
poststorm permitting plan to expedite recovery and rebuilding by
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1109-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1109 2026
providing for special building permit and inspection procedures
after a hurricane or tropical storm. The plan must, at a
minimum:
1. Ensure sufficient personnel are prepared and available
to expeditiously manage postdisaster building inspection,
permitting, and enforcement tasks. The plan must anticipate
conditions that would necessitate supplemental personnel for
such tasks and address methods for fulfilling such personnel
needs, including through mutual aid agreements as authorized in
s. 252.40; other arrangements, such as those with private sector
contractors; or supplemental state or federal funding. The plan
must include training requirements and protocols for
supplemental personnel to ensure compliance with local
floodplain management requirements that apply within the county
or municipality, including the training program required under
s. 468.634(3), if applicable.
2. Account for multiple or alternate locations where
building permit services may be offered in person to the public
following a hurricane or tropical storm during regular business
hours.
3. Specify a protocol to expedite permitting procedures
and, if practicable, for the waiver or reduction of applicable
fees in accordance with and in addition to the procedures and
waivers provided for under s. 553.7922. The plan must identify
the types of permits that are frequently requested following a
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1109-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1109 2026
hurricane or tropical storm and methods to expedite the
processing of such permits.
4. Specify procedures and resources necessary to promote
expeditious debris removal following a hurricane or tropical
storm.
Section 3. Section 468.634, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
468.634 Emergency provisions.—
(1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Governor may allow
a person to act in any of the following positions if such person
is qualified for such work in a state that has a mutual aid
agreement entered into pursuant to 252.40(2) and such person has
taken the training program described in subsection (2) and, if
applicable, subsection (3):
(a) Building code inspector.
(b) Building inspector.
(c) Coastal construction inspector.
(d) Commercial electrical inspector.
(e) Electrical inspector.
(f) Mechanical inspector.
(g) Plumbing inspector.
(h) Residential electrical inspector.
(i) Residential inspector.
(j) Plans examiner.
100 (k) Building plans examiner.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1109-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1109 2026
101 (l) Plumbing plans examiner.
102 (m) Mechanical plans examiner.
103 (n) Electrical plan examiner.
104 (2) The Division of Emergency Management and the
105 Department of Business and Professional Regulation shall develop
106 a Florida Building Code training program.
107 (3) A local government with a local amendment to the
108 Florida Building Code shall develop a training program on all
109 local amendments applicable within the jurisdiction of such
110 government.
111 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1109-00